Hawaii statutes.
[§353D-7] Annual report. The agency
administering the program shall annually submit to the department and to the
legislature a report to include, but not limited to, the following:

(1) A quantitative and narrative description of the
services rendered;

(2) A description of the impact of the centers'
services to families;

(3) A description of areas for improvement of
services or coordination with other public or private agencies; and

(4) A description of the community resources which
were utilized. [L 1987, c 251, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next